District of Columbia statutes.
11-2104

Powers and duties; restrictions.

(a)

The Register of Wills may —

(1)

receive inventories and accounts of sales, examine vouchers, and state accounts of executors, administrators, collectors, and guardians, subject to final approval of the court;

(2)

take the probate of claims against the estates of deceased persons that are properly brought before the Register of Wills, and approve or reject claims not exceeding $300;

(3)

take the probate of wills and accept the bonds of executors, administrators, collectors, and guardians, subject to approval of the court; and

(4)

audit and state fiduciary accounts.

(b)

In matters over which the Superior Court has probate jurisdiction or powers, the Register of Wills shall —

(1)

make full and fair entries, in separate records, of the proceedings of the court;

(2)

record in electronic or other format all wills proved before the Register of Wills or the court and other matters required by law to be recorded in the court;

(3)

lodge in places of safety designated by the court original papers filed with the Register of Wills;

(4)

make out and issue every summons, process, and order of the court;

(5)

prepare and submit to the Executive Officer of the District of Columbia courts such reports as may be required; and

(6)

in every respect, act under the control and direction of the court.

(c)

The Register of Wills may not —

(1)

practice law in any court of the District of Columbia or of the United States; or

(2)

demand or receive any fee, gratuity, gift, or reward for giving advice in any matter relating to the office.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 5(b)
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(98)-(102), 108 Stat. 713
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2024, Pub. L. 109-356, § 111(a), (b)(1)

History

1981 Ed., § 11-2104.
1973 Ed., § 11-2104.

Prior Codifications

Pub. L. 109-356, in the section heading, deleted “penalties”; and rewrote subsec. (b) and repealed subsecs. (d) and (e).

Effect of Amendments